Hawaii statutes.
[§383-29.6] Partial unemployment;
eligibility. A new claim or an initial additional claim for partial
unemployment benefits may be filed as the department prescribes for any week
only if the individual:

(1) Is a full-time worker;

(2) Is attached to a regular employer, as defined in
section 383-1;

(3) Worked less than or did not work the individual's
normal, customary full-time hours, as defined in section 383-1, for that week;

(4) Had no earnings or earned less than the
individual's weekly benefit amount for that week; and

(5) Was unemployed due to a lack of full-time work,
as defined in section 383-1, for that week. [L 2009, c 170, pt of §2, §7; am L
2010, c 76, §3; am L 2011, c 165, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next